Illinois, session 104th, HB2654.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Lottery Law is amended by changing 5Section 14 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1605/14)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1164)7    Sec. 14. 8    (a) No person shall sell a ticket or share at a price 9greater than that fixed by rule or regulation of the 10Department. No person other than a licensed lottery sales 11agent or distributor shall sell or resell lottery tickets or 12shares. No person shall charge a fee to redeem a winning ticket 13or share.14    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a licensed lottery 15sales agent may enter into an agreement with a third-party 16entity to assist with processing the sale of lottery tickets 17on behalf of the licensed lottery sales agent. The licensed 18sales agent shall provide a copy of agreement to the Board 19within 5 business days of execution. The agreement shall 20include at least the following:21        (1) terminal usage cannot be commingled at the 22    location;23        (2) a ticket may only be sold to a person physically   HB2654- 2 -LRB104 07065 LNS 17102 b1    located in the State;2        (3) a third-party entity shall not share or sell user 3    data to an entity unaffiliated with the retailer or 4    third-party entity; and5        (4) the third-party entity shall adhere to all rules 6    established by the Board related to the sale of lottery 7    tickets. 8    (c) Any person convicted of violating this Section shall 9be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; provided, that if any 10offense under this Section is a subsequent offense, the 11offender shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.12(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11.)